Maryland, session 2025, HB0039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
[18–601.1.
(a) An individual who has the human immunodeficiency virus may not knowingly
transfer or attempt to transfer the human immunodeficiency virus to another individual.
(b) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $2,500 or imprisonment not exceeding
3 years or both.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 1 –